Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 4

General Provisions Governing the Issuance of All Notes by Local Governments

9-21-401. Applicability.

The terms of this part and part 1 of this chapter shall be applicable to the authorization and issuance by any local government of debt under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-1; 2014, ch. 766, § 2.

9-21-402. Notes issued to finance industrial parks.

A local government which intends to issue bond anticipation notes, capital outlay notes or grant anticipation notes to finance an industrial park shall first comply with title 13, chapter 16.

A local government which intends to issue bond anticipation notes, capital outlay notes or grant anticipation notes to finance a business park shall first comply with the requirements outlined in § 9-21-105(21)(B)(i).

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a certificate of public purpose and necessity shall not be required to finance an industrial park or a business park in any local government with a population of not less than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. The total pledge of full faith and credit of any such local government related to the project shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of any property in the local government, ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of issuance of the obligations. In any resolution pledging the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of any such local government to secure any obligations related to the project, the governing body of the local government shall state that the project being considered is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect for success, will provide proper economic development and employment, and will not likely become a burden on the taxpayers of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-2; 1998, ch. 728, § 2; 2006, ch. 770, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

9-21-403. Budget approval required by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

In order for the fiscal affairs of a local government to be maintained on a cash basis, after the issuance of any debt as provided by this chapter, and in order that the current receipts of such local government shall be sufficient to meet current expenditures, an annual budget shall be required of the local government by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The annual budget shall be prepared in a form consistent with accepted governmental standards and as approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the comptroller of the treasury may authorize a municipality to submit a biennial budget if the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee determines that the municipality operates with sufficient financial resources to more than adequately service its issued debt. In such case, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may approve the municipality for a biennial budget as authorized by § 4-3-305.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may revoke the authority of a municipality to submit a biennial budget in its discretion at any time and for any reason. If a municipality utilizes short-term financing to meet operating expenses, then the authority to submit a biennial budget shall be automatically revoked.

A municipality that operates under a biennial budget shall submit any budget amendments adopted by the municipality and such reports as may be required to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

As used in subdivision (a)(2), “biennial budget” means the adoption of two (2) annual budgets every two (2) years.

After receiving the annual budget estimate, the governing body shall prepare an appropriation resolution, using the budget estimate as a basis, but appropriating such sums as the governing body may deem proper for current operating expenses, whether greater or less than the budget estimate set forth. However, no appropriation recommended by the budget estimate for interest on the indebtedness of the local government for sinking funds and for principal of debt maturing during the fiscal year shall be reduced by the governing body. The taxes levied for such appropriation may be over and above all other taxes authorized or limited by law. Immediately after the passage of the appropriation resolution, the governing body shall pass a resolution levying upon all property subject to taxation, a tax rate sufficient to produce the sum necessary to balance the budget upon a cash basis.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall require any periodic information from a local government which has issued debt under this chapter or under prior authorizing statutes and make such audits as the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may deem necessary, to the end that it may be ascertained that the budget is kept balanced during the life of the debt. The annual budget of each local government with debt outstanding shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee immediately upon its adoption. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee must thereupon determine whether or not the budget will be in balance in accordance with this chapter. If the budget does not comply with this chapter, then the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall have the power and the authority to direct the governing body of the local government to adjust its estimates or to make additional tax levies sufficient to comply with this chapter. Any budget adopted by the governing body of a local government which had debt outstanding at the beginning of the fiscal year which was issued under this chapter or under prior statutes shall not become the official budget for the fiscal year until such budget is approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall approve the budget only when the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee is satisfied that it complies with this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-3; 2010, ch. 868, § 48; 2014, ch. 766, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 626, § 1.

9-21-404. Sanction for failure to submit the annual budget to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

If a proper budget is not submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee when required under this part within five (5) months of the beginning of the fiscal year, then the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee will cause notice to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the local government once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks, stating that the budget has not been submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and that the local government is operating contrary to this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-4; 2010, ch. 868, § 49.

9-21-405. Definition of “period.”

“Period,” as used in this part and parts 5-8 of this chapter, includes in each instance any number of portions of time not exceeding in the aggregate the length of time included in such period.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-5.

9-21-406. Nonconforming obligations.

Any note or promise to repay money (herein called “obligation”) issued or made under this chapter contrary to requirements precedent to the issuance of notes under this part and parts 5-8 of this chapter, as the case may be, shall be considered nonconforming and shall be subject to the restrictions and penalties of this section.

Upon identification of a nonconforming obligation the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall send written notice to offending parties, including the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of the affected local government. This notice shall contain a detailed description of:

The nature of the nonconformance;

Specific corrective actions necessary to bring the obligation into conformity; and

A reasonable time, as determined by the comptroller or comptroller's designee, within which the local government shall complete the necessary corrective actions.

Upon receipt of a notice issued pursuant to subsection (b), a local government shall respond to the notice in writing within ten (10) business days. This response shall state:

Acknowledgment of the alleged nonconformance, and:

A detailed plan for obtaining conformity;

A statement as to whether the time frame established by the notice of subsection (b) is sufficient to complete corrective actions necessary for conformance; and

If necessary, a request for additional time to complete corrective actions necessary for conformance; or

Disputation of the alleged nonconformance, and:

A detailed explanation of reasons for disputation; and

A request for reconsideration.

Upon receipt of the response required by subsection (c), the comptroller or comptroller's designee shall within ten (10) business days send a written response to the chief executive officer of the local government, the chief financial officer of the local government and the local governing body. That response shall:

In cases where the local government acknowledges initial determination of the comptroller or the comptroller's designee:

Accept or deny the plan offered pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(A); and

Where applicable, approve or deny the request made pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(C) for additional time to complete corrective actions necessary to obtain conformity; or

In cases where the local government disputes the initial determination of the comptroller or comptroller's designee, contain a statement addressing the merits of the disputation. This statement shall:

Accept the disputation and consider the obligation in conformity; or

Deny the disputation and restate the necessary corrective actions and reasonable time frame for completing such.

At the conclusion of the time frame established pursuant to subsection (d) by the comptroller or comptroller's designee for completion of the necessary corrective actions the comptroller or comptroller's designee shall, within ten (10) business days, make a determination as to whether the local government has completed the necessary corrective actions to the official's satisfaction.

Upon the determination that the necessary corrective actions have been satisfactorily completed, the obligation shall be considered in conformity and no penalty shall be assessed. Notice of such shall, within ten (10) business days of determination, be sent to all parties.

Upon the determination that the necessary corrective actions have not been satisfactorily completed, notice shall be sent to all parties, including the chief executive office of the local government, the chief financial officer of the local government and the local governing body. Such notice shall be sent within ten (10) business days of such determination and shall include:

A statement of nonconformance;

A written explanation of deficiencies in conformance; and

A statement that the nonconformance shall be reported to the comptroller and that the parties shall be subject to the penalty provisions of this section.

Upon receipt of a notice of nonconformance issued pursuant to subdivision (e)(3) the comptroller shall:

Levy a penalty in accordance with the guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (g);

Upon a determination that it is in the best interests of fairness, extend the time frame in which parties may complete necessary corrective action, before a penalty is levied; or

Waive the penalty.

The state funding board shall develop and adopt guidelines for the purpose of identifying classifications of nonconformity and levying of penalties pursuant to this section. In developing and adopting these guidelines, the following shall be taken into consideration:

The distinction between material nonconformance and administrative nonconformance;

The distinction between willful or knowing nonconformance and inadvertent or accidental nonconformance;

The existence and extent or absence of actual damages to the public;

That every penalty imposed should be levied upon a totality of the circumstances; and

Where determining the necessity of public notification of nonconforming obligations, the comptroller shall use a method commensurate with the nature of the nonconformance.

The comptroller or the comptroller's designee may extend the time for written notices or responses provided for in this section for a reasonable duration upon a determination that such extension of time is in the best interest of the parties. An offending party or affected local government may request an extension of time by submitting such request with reasoning to the comptroller or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-6; 1988, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 868, § 50; 2011, ch. 458, § 1.

9-21-407. Remedies of noteholders.

Any holder of notes issued pursuant to this chapter has the right, in addition to all other rights:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce such holder's rights against the local government, the governing body of the local government and any officer, agent, or employee of the local government, including, but not limited to, the right to require the local government, the governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the local government to assess, levy and collect taxes, and to fix and collect fees, rents, tolls, or other charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, such taxes, fees, rents, tolls, or other charges, and to require the local government, the governing body of the local government and any officer, agent or employee of the local government to carry out any other covenants and agreements, and to perform its and their duties under this chapter. No holder or holders of notes payable exclusively from the revenues of a public works project shall ever have the right to compel the levying and collection of taxes to pay such notes and the interest thereon; and

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or a violation of the rights of such holder or holders of notes.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 4-7.

9-21-408. Interfund loans.

Local governments are hereby authorized to make interfund loans in accordance with procedures for issuance of notes or bonds in part 5, 7 or 8 of this chapter or § 9-21-604.

Local governments are hereby authorized to make interfund loans in accordance with the procedures of § 9-21-604(b) of all funds derived from the sale of any Tennessee private act hospital established pursuant to private acts of the state and the Private Act Hospital Authority Act of 1996, compiled in title 7, chapter 57, part 6. This section does not authorize the expenditure of funds derived from the sale of a private act hospital for any purpose contrary to law or applicable court order.

Acts 1994, ch. 806, § 9; 2016, ch. 832, § 1.